Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.900

Decriminalization of certain municipal ordinances.

Any municipal criminal ordinance in existence on the January 1, 1989, which is the same as or substantially similar to a statute which is decriminalized by sections 25 through 30 and 32, chapter 456, Laws of 1987 is deemed to be civil in nature and shall be punished as provided in this chapter.

[ 1987 c 456 s 31.]